Utah statutes.
53A-25b-302.   Entrance polices and procedures.
With input from the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind, school districts,
parents, and the advisory council, the board shall establish entrance policies
and procedures that IEP teams and Section 504 teams are to consider in making
placement recommendations at the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind.
